Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 62. Office of the Long Term Care Ombudsman.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to litigation, hearings, investigations, and other proceedings pending under a law repealed or a function transferred by, or a contract, right, liability, or obligation affected by, the executive order setting out the office of the long-term care ombudsman under the Alaska Mental Health Authority, see § 11, Executive Order 102, in the Executive Orders pamphlet.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 19, SLA 2017 (SB 83), which amended this chapter, see 2017 Senate Journal 456 — 457.

Sec. 47.62.010.
Office established.

The office of the long term care ombudsman is established in the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority (AS

47.30.011

).

The ombudsman shall be hired by the authority. A member of the authority who has a financial interest in a long term care facility in the state, or who has any other conflict of interest, may not participate in the hiring of the ombudsman. The ombudsman is a full-time position in the classified service. The ombudsman shall be compensated at no less than Range 21 of the pay plan for state employees under AS

39.27.011

.

The ombudsman may not have a financial interest in a long term care facility in the state. The authority shall adopt regulations to ensure that the ombudsman, and employees and volunteers of the office, do not have a conflict of interest or an appearance of a conflict of interest.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001); am § 3 ch 15 SLA 2001)

Sec. 47.62.015.
Duties and powers of the long term care ombudsman.

The ombudsman shall investigate and resolve a complaint made by or on behalf of an older Alaskan who resides in a long term care facility in the state if the complaint relates to a decision, action, or failure to act by a provider or a representative of a provider of long term care services, or by a public agency or social services agency, that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of the older Alaskan. At the discretion of the ombudsman, the ombudsman may investigate and resolve a complaint made by or on behalf of a resident who is not an older Alaskan if the complaint relates to a decision, action, or failure to act by a provider or a representative of a provider of long term care services, or by a public agency or social services agency, that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of the resident.

The ombudsman may investigate and resolve a complaint made by or on behalf of an older Alaskan relating to the long term care or residential circumstances of the older Alaskan. Complaints under this subsection may relate to any issue not covered under (a) of this section, including the older Alaskan’s landlord, senior citizen housing, a public assistance program, a public grant program for services to older Alaskans, public utilities, health care facilities, and health care providers.

The ombudsman may

subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer oaths, and examine any person under oath in connection with a complaint described under (a) of this section; the powers described in this paragraph shall be enforced by the superior court;

pursue administrative, legal, or other appropriate remedies on behalf of a resident of a long term care facility in the state.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001); am §§ 8, 9 ch 19 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, in (a), added the second sentence; in (c)(2), substituted “a resident of” for “an older Alaskan who resides in” following “on behalf of”.

Sec. 47.62.020.
Training and certification of staff.

The ombudsman shall provide for the training and certification of office staff, including volunteers and other representatives of the office. Training must include instruction in federal, state, and local laws and policies relating to long term care facilities in the state, and in investigative techniques. The ombudsman may require other appropriate training. The ombudsman may decertify a person under this section for good cause in accordance with regulations adopted by the authority.

An employee, volunteer, or other representative of the office may not investigate a complaint under AS

47.62.015

unless certified as having completed training under this section and approved by the ombudsman as qualified to investigate the complaint.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001))

Sec. 47.62.025.
Access to long term care facilities, residents, and records.

A person may not deny access to a long term care facility or to a resident of a long term care facility by the ombudsman or an employee, volunteer, or other representative of the office.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

47.62.015(c)(1)

, the ombudsman may obtain medical or other records of a resident of a long term care facility in the state only with the consent of the resident or the person’s resident representative or legal guardian or, if the resident is unable or incompetent to consent and does not have a resident representative, only with a subpoena or court order.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001); am § 10 ch 19 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, rewrote the section.

Sec. 47.62.030.
Confidentiality.

Records obtained or maintained by the ombudsman are confidential, are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

and, except as provided in (b) of this section, may be disclosed only at the discretion of the ombudsman.

The identity of a complainant or an older Alaskan or resident of a long term care facility on whose behalf a complaint is made may only be disclosed with the consent of the identified person or the person’s legal guardian or resident representative or by court order. However, if an older Alaskan is unable to provide consent and does not have a legal guardian, or if a resident of a long term care facility is unable to provide consent and does not have a resident representative, the ombudsman may disclose the identity of an identified person for the purpose of making a referral to an agency or person, if the ombudsman or an employee or volunteer of the office

has reasonable cause to believe that an action, inaction, or decision, including an action, inaction, or decision by a resident representative or a legal guardian of an older Alaskan, may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of the older Alaskan or resident;

has reasonable cause to believe the referral is in the best interest of the older Alaskan or resident;

obtains the approval of the ombudsman for the disclosure and referral; and

does not have evidence that the older Alaskan or resident would disagree with the referral.

History.

(E.O. 102 § 9 (2001); am § 11 ch 19 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, rewrote (b), which read, “The identity of a complainant or an older Alaskan on whose behalf a complaint is made may not be disclosed without the consent of the identified person or the person's legal guardian, unless required by court order.”

Sec. 47.62.035.
Immunity from liability.

A person who, in good faith, makes a complaint described in AS

47.62.015

is immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise exist for making the complaint.

The ombudsman, or an employee, volunteer, or other representative of the office, is immune from civil or criminal liability for the good faith performance of official duties.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001))

Sec. 47.62.040.
Interference with the long term care ombudsman and retaliation prohibited.

A person may not intentionally interfere with the ombudsman, or an employee, volunteer, or representative of the office, in the performance of official duties under AS

47.62.015

.

If a person makes a good faith complaint described in AS

47.62.015

, an employer or supervisor of the person, or a public or private agency or entity that provides benefits, services, or housing to the person, may not discharge, demote, transfer, reduce the pay or benefits or work privileges of, prepare a negative work performance evaluation of, deny or withhold benefits or services, evict, or take other detrimental action against the person because of the complaint. The person making the complaint may bring a civil action for compensatory and punitive damages against an employer, supervisor, agency, or entity that violates this subsection. In the civil action there is a rebuttable presumption that the detrimental action was retaliatory if it was taken within 90 days after the complaint was made.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001))

Sec. 47.62.050.
Legal counsel for the long term care ombudsman.

The attorney general shall provide legal advice and representation in connection with any matter relating to the powers, duties, and operation of the office, and in any legal action brought against the ombudsman or an employee, volunteer, or other representative of the office. If the attorney general cannot provide legal advice or representation because of a conflict of interest, the ombudsman may employ private legal counsel.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001))

Sec. 47.62.060.
Cooperative agreements.

The authority shall enter into cooperative agreements concerning the operations of the office, including protocols for investigations, with state and local agencies that have jurisdiction over long term care facilities or over the abuse and neglect of older Alaskans or residents of long term care facilities.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001); am § 12 ch 19 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, added “or residents of long term care facilities” at the end.

Sec. 47.62.090.
Definitions.

In AS

47.62.010

—

47.62.090

,

“authority” means the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established in AS

47.30.011

;

“long term care facility” means an assisted living home, as defined in AS

47.32.900

, and a nursing facility, as defined in AS

47.32.900

;

“office” means the office of the long term care ombudsman;

“older Alaskan” means a person who is 60 years of age or older and who resides in the state;

“ombudsman” means the long term care ombudsman hired under AS

47.62.010

;

“resident” means a person who resides in a long term care facility in the state;

“resident representative” means

an individual chosen by a resident to act on behalf of the resident to

support the resident in decision making;

access medical, social, or other personal information of the resident;

manage financial matters; or

receive notifications;

a person authorized by federal or state law to act on behalf of a resident.

“senior citizen housing” has the meaning given “senior housing” in AS

18.56.799

.

History.

(E.O. No. 102 § 9 (2001); am § 41 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§
13, 14 ch 19 SLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (6) and (7) were enacted as (7) and (8); renumbered in 2017, at which time former paragraph (6) was renumbered as (8).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, rewrote paragraph (2).

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, rewrote (4), which read, “‘older Alaskan’ means a resident who is 60 years of age or older”; added (7) and (8) [now (6) and (7)].